Arkansas, session 2025, SB578.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-5-418, concerning early voting locations,
is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(h)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (h)(3) of this section, the
county board of election commissioners may call an emergency meeting held in
person or by electronic means to close one (1) or more early voting locations
for one (1) or more days due to inclement weather.
(2) An emergency meeting called under subdivision (h)(1) of this
section shall require a unanimous vote by the county board of election
commissioners to close an early voting location.
(3) The county board of election commissioners shall not close
at least one (1) early voting location in the county seat that shall remain
open every day that is designated for early voting.
(4) As used in this subsection, "county seat" means the same as
*SSS238*
03/31/2025 10:38:26 AM SSS238

SB578
defined in § 14-14-301.



































03/31/2025 10:38:26 AM SSS238